Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE F. STATE AND LOCAL CONTRACTS AND FUND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 2277. AGREEMENTS WITH PROFESSIONAL SPORTS TEAMS

Sec. 2277.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Governmental entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 2251.001.

(2) "Professional sports team" has the meaning assigned by Section 2004.002, Occupations Code. The term includes a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of a professional sports team that exists to make a profit.

(3) "Sporting event" means any preseason, regular season, or postseason game of a professional sports team.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2274 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(23), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 2277.002. PROVISIONS REQUIRED IN CERTAIN AGREEMENTS. A governmental entity may not enter into an agreement with a professional sports team that requires a financial commitment by this state or any governmental entity unless the agreement includes:

(1) a written verification that the professional sports team will play the United States national anthem at the beginning of each team sporting event held at the team's home venue or other facility controlled by the team for the event; and

(2) a provision providing that failure to comply with the written verification required by Subdivision (1) for any team sporting event at the team's home venue or other facility:

(A) constitutes a default of the agreement;

(B) immediately subjects the team to any penalty the agreement authorizes for default, which may include requiring the team to repay any money paid to the team by this state or any governmental entity or classifying the team as ineligible to receive further money under the agreement; and

(C) may subject the team to debarment from contracting with this state.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2274 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(23), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 2277.003. STRICT ADHERENCE TO DEFAULT PROVISION. (a) A governmental entity that enters into an agreement with a professional sports team shall strictly adhere to the default provision required by Section 2277.002(2).

(b) If a governmental entity fails to timely adhere to the default provision required under Section 2277.002(2), the attorney general may intervene to enforce the provision.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2274 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(23), eff. September 1, 2023.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.002(13), eff. September 1, 2023.